morpho/german_full.foma
read lexc data/german_full.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Vovel [ a | e | i | o | u ];

define VerbGeInfix "_" -> g e || .#. ?* _ ?* "^" "_" g e ;
define CleanupGeMark "^" "_" g e -> 0 ;
define VerbNullInfix "_" -> 0 || .#. ?* _ ?* "^" "_" n u l l ;
define CleanupNullMark "^" "_" n u l l -> 0 ;
define CleanupUnusedVerbPrefixMark "_" -> 0 || .#. _ ;

define UmlautApply a -> ä, e -> ë, o -> ö, u -> ü || .#. \Vovel* _ ?* "^" "¨" ;
define EDeletion e -> 0 || [ r | l ] "^" _ n ;
define UmlautCleanup "¨" -> 0 || "^" _ ;
define CleanupHats "^" -> 0;

define RemoveSeparatedPrefix ?* "_" -> 0 || .#. _ ;

define Grammar Lexicon .o.
    VerbGeInfix .o.
    CleanupGeMark .o.
    VerbNullInfix .o.
    CleanupNullMark .o.
    CleanupUnusedVerbPrefixMark .o.
    UmlautApply .o.
    EDeletion .o.
    UmlautCleanup .o.
    CleanupHats .o.
    RemoveSeparatedPrefix;

regex Grammar;
